lexc/verb/enhuigeh.lexc
LEXICON Case6
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON AddVerb55
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case55;

LEXICON Case55
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§ék     #; !omoljék

LEXICON AddVerb7
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep7;

LEXICON Rep7
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imper7;
                    Imper8;

LEXICON Imper7
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep7;
                      Nrep9;
LEXICON Imper8
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep7;
                      Nrep8;

LEXICON Nrep7
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper7;
                      NImper9;
LEXICON Nrep9
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper7;
                      NImper9;

LEXICON Nrep8
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImper7;
                      NImper8;

LEXICON NImper7
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot7;
                      Pot9;
LEXICON NImper9
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot7;
                      Pot9;

LEXICON NImper8
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot7;
                      Pot8;

LEXICON Pot7
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf7;
             Case7;
LEXICON Pot9
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf7;
             Case7;

LEXICON Pot8
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf7;
             Case8;
LEXICON AddInf7
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
               Case7;

LEXICON Verb
alapszabályoz AddVerb7;
bazsalyog AddVerb55;
bomol AddVerb55;
bájolog AddVerb55;
csikorog AddVerb55;
csorog AddVerb55;
csurog AddVerb55;
céloz AddVerb7;
dohányoz AddVerb55;
dohányoz AddVerb7;
egyensúlyoz AddVerb55;
egyensúlyoz AddVerb7;
ellenrendszabályoz AddVerb7;
ellensúlyoz AddVerb7;
fanyalog AddVerb55;
fintorog AddVerb55;
forog AddVerb55;
foszol AddVerb55;
fuldokol AddVerb55;
fuvaroz AddVerb7;
gomolyog AddVerb55;
haboz AddVerb55;
haboz AddVerb7;
haldokol AddVerb55;
hangoz AddVerb55;
hangoz AddVerb7;
hiányoz AddVerb55;
hiányoz AddVerb7;
horgonyoz AddVerb55;
horgonyoz AddVerb7;
hunyorog AddVerb55;
háborog AddVerb55;
háramol AddVerb55;
hármasszabályoz AddVerb7;
hólyagoz AddVerb55;
hólyagoz AddVerb7;
imbolyog AddVerb55;
inog AddVerb55;
irányoz AddVerb7;
jobbkézszabályoz AddVerb7;
jogszabályoz AddVerb7;
kanyarog AddVerb55;
kavarog AddVerb55;
kormányoz AddVerb7;
korog AddVerb55;
kínoz AddVerb7;
kódorog AddVerb55;
kóvályog AddVerb55;
légszabályoz AddVerb7;
magoz AddVerb55;
magoz AddVerb7;
mocorog AddVerb55;
nyikorog AddVerb55;
omol AddVerb55;
oroz AddVerb7;
oszol AddVerb55;
osztályoz AddVerb7;
párolog AddVerb55;
pároz AddVerb55;
pároz AddVerb7;
ragoz AddVerb7;
rendszabályoz AddVerb7;
romol AddVerb55;
sajog AddVerb55;
somolyog AddVerb55;
sompolyog AddVerb55;
sugároz AddVerb55;
sugároz AddVerb7;
sutyorog AddVerb55;
szabályoz AddVerb7;
szivárog AddVerb55;
szoroz AddVerb7;
születésszabályoz AddVerb7;
sóvárog AddVerb55;
tajtékoz AddVerb55;
tajtékoz AddVerb7;
toboroz AddVerb7;
toporog AddVerb55;
totyorog AddVerb55;
támolyog AddVerb55;
tántorog AddVerb55;
társalog AddVerb55;
tébolyog AddVerb55;
túloz AddVerb7;
vicsorog AddVerb55;
vigyorog AddVerb55;
virágoz AddVerb55;
virágoz AddVerb7;
visszhangoz AddVerb55;
visszhangoz AddVerb7;
viszolyog AddVerb55;
vánszorog AddVerb55;
zuborog AddVerb55;
zuhanyoz AddVerb7;
ámolyog AddVerb55;
áramol AddVerb55;
